Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
634J]

VEXATIOUS
LITIGANTS

Section

634J-1 Definitions

634J-2 Motion for order requiring plaintiff to
post security

634J-3 Hearing procedure

634J-4 Finding; amount of security

634J-5 Dismissal on failure to post security

634J-6 Motion as stay of proceedings

634J-7 Vexatious litigant; prefiling order
prohibiting filing

of new litigation

Cross References

Nonconsensual common law liens, see chapter 507D.

Case Notes

This chapter and §634J-7 are applicable where a party seeks
to maintain litigation in an existing case, such as by the filing of a motion,
as well as to the filing of an entirely new case. 102 H. 289, 75 P.3d 1180
(2003).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next